Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1465
Mobile home space, defined.

Mobile home space shall mean a designated portion of a mobile home park designed for the accommodation of one mobile home and its accessory buildings or structures for the exclusive use of the occupants.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 16.